District of Columbia statutes.
44-1208

Limitations on benefits.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to create an entitlement to substance abuse treatment during any fiscal year if no funds remain available to the District government under a District government or federal appropriation that has been enacted for the specific purpose of providing substance abuse treatment services or unless the person has the ability to pay.

History

Mar. 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-80, § 9, 36 DCR 8469

Section References

This section is referenced in § 44-1202.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-1608.